Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-473
Permit for hunting mountain lions;
application fee; auction; use of proceeds.

(1) The commission may issue permits
for hunting mountain lions and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
therefor within the limitations prescribed in subsection (1) of section 37-447
and section 37-452 for hunting deer. Any authorized permits shall be issued
to residents of Nebraska, except that permits issued by auction may be issued
to nonresidents.

(2)
The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a nonrefundable
application fee of not more than twenty-five dollars for permits issued only
to residents. Any number of resident-only permits, as authorized by the commission,
shall be awarded by random drawing to eligible applicants. No permit fee shall
be charged in addition to the nonrefundable application fee.

(3)
No more than one additional permit may be authorized and issued pursuant to
an auction open to residents and nonresidents. The auction shall be conducted
according to rules and regulations prescribed by the commission. Any money
derived from the sale of permits by auction shall be used only for perpetuation
and management of mountain lions.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 2.